Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 152. AMOUNT OF COMPENSATION, EXPENSES, AND ALLOWANCES OF COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 152.001. FUNDS FROM WHICH AMOUNTS ARE PAID. Unless otherwise provided by law, the compensation, expenses, and allowances set under this code for a district, county, or precinct officer or employee may be paid from the general fund of the county in which the officer or employee serves or from any other funds that are available for that purpose.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.002. SALARY DONATION TO COUNTY. The county may accept from an elected county or precinct officer a gift or donation of all or part of the salary paid by the county to the officer. The county treasurer shall deposit a gift or donation accepted under this section in the general fund of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1259, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. AMOUNT OF COMPENSATION, EXPENSES, AND ALLOWANCES GENERALLY APPLICABLE

Sec. 152.011. AMOUNT SET BY COMMISSIONERS COURT. The commissioners court of a county shall set the amount of the compensation, office and travel expenses, and all other allowances for county and precinct officers and employees who are paid wholly from county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.012. MINIMUM AMOUNT OF SALARY. The commissioners court may not set the salary of an officer or employee at an amount less than the amount of the salary in effect on January 1, 1972. The court may not set the salary of a justice of the peace at an amount less than the amount of the salary in effect on May 25, 1973.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.013. PROCEDURE FOR SETTING AMOUNTS FOR ELECTED OFFICERS. (a) Each year the commissioners court shall set the salary, expenses, and other allowances of elected county or precinct officers. The commissioners court shall set the items at a regular meeting of the court during the regular budget hearing and adoption proceedings.

(b) Before the 10th day before the date of the meeting, the commissioners court must publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a notice of:

(1) any salaries, expenses, or allowances that are proposed to be increased; and

(2) the amount of the proposed increases.

(c) Before filing the annual budget with the county clerk, the commissioners court shall give written notice to each elected county and precinct officer of the officer's salary and personal expenses to be included in the budget.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.014. SALARY GRIEVANCE COMMITTEE. (a) In each county there is a salary grievance committee composed of the county judge and:

(1) the sheriff, county tax assessor-collector, county treasurer, county clerk, district clerk, county attorney or criminal district attorney, and the number of public members necessary to provide nine voting members; or

(2) nine public members, if the commissioners court votes to have nine public members.

(b) The county judge is chairman of the committee, but is not entitled to vote.

(c) Public members must be residents of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 131, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 152.015. SELECTION AND TERM OF PUBLIC MEMBERS ON GRIEVANCE COMMITTEE. (a) The public members of the salary grievance committee shall be selected as provided by Subsection (b) or (b-1) at a meeting of the commissioners court at any time during the year, but not later than the 15th day after the date a request for a hearing is received under Section 152.016(a). If a request for a public hearing is not received, the commissioners court is not required to select public members.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), before the meeting required by Subsection (a), the county clerk shall place on a separate slip the name of each person who served on a grand jury in the county during the preceding calendar year. At the meeting the slips shall be folded, placed in an appropriate container, and mixed. The county judge shall draw at random a number of slips equal to the number of public members needed for the committee and shall announce the names on the slips. At the meeting the county judge may repeat this process and make a list of alternates.

(b-1) As an alternative to the process prescribed by Subsection (b), the commissioners court may direct the county clerk to use a computer to generate a randomized list of the names of all persons who served on a grand jury in the county during the preceding calendar year. At the meeting required by Subsection (a), the commissioners court shall:

(1) adopt the randomized list;

(2) enter the list into the minutes of the meeting; and

(3) select, in the order of the list, the necessary number of public members and alternates.

(b-2) A person whose name is selected under this section becomes a member of the committee or an alternate on submitting written acceptance of the selection to the clerk. If a person refuses or is unable to serve on the committee, a replacement shall be appointed from the list of alternates. If the list of alternates is exhausted or does not exist, a replacement shall be selected from the remaining names not already selected, in the same manner as the replaced member, at the next regular or called commissioners court meeting. This process shall be repeated until the required number of public members have accepted the selection.

(c) A public member serves until the later of:

(1) the end of the fiscal year in which the public member is appointed; or

(2) the time the committee takes a final vote on the last of the grievances for which the committee held a public hearing.

(d) A vacancy in a public member position shall be filled for the unexpired part of the term by appointment from the list of alternates. If the list of alternates is exhausted or does not exist, a replacement shall be selected from the remaining names not already selected, in the same manner as the vacating member, at a meeting of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 131, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1021, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 212 (H.B. 840), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 152.016. FUNCTIONS OF GRIEVANCE COMMITTEE IN RELATION TO ELECTED OFFICERS. (a) An elected county or precinct officer who is aggrieved by the setting of the officer's salary or personal expenses may request a hearing before the salary grievance committee before the approval of the county's annual budget. The request must:

(1) be in writing;

(2) be delivered to the committee chairman within five days after the date the officer receives notice of the salary or personal expenses; and

(3) state the desired change in salary or personal expenses.

(b) The committee shall hold a public hearing not later than the later of the 10th day after:

(1) the date the request is received; or

(2) the date the commissioners court selects the public members of the committee.

(b-1) The chairman shall announce the time and place of the hearing.

(c) If, after the hearing, six or more of the members vote to recommend an increase in the officer's salary or personal expenses, the committee shall submit its recommendation to the commissioners court in writing. If six to eight members vote to recommend the increase, the commissioners court shall consider the recommendation at its next meeting. If nine members vote to recommend the increase and sign the recommendation, the commissioners court shall include the increase in the budget before the budget is filed and the increase takes effect in the next budget year.

(d) The committee's authority is limited to the consideration of increases in the salaries or personal expenses of county and precinct officers. The committee may not set policy of the county or add new items to a proposed county budget.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 131, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 152.0165. EXHAUSTION OF REMEDIES BEFORE FILING SUIT REGARDING GRIEVANCE. (a) An elected county or precinct officer may not file suit regarding the officer's salary or personal expenses unless a hearing has been requested and held under Section 152.016.

(b) This section does not affect a defense, immunity, or jurisdictional bar available to a county or a county official or employee that is sued by a county or precinct officer based on the officer's salary, office and travel expenses, or other allowances.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 439, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.017. EXCEPTIONS. This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a judge of a court of record;

(2) a presiding judge of a commissioners court in a county with a population of 3.3 million or more;

(3) a district attorney paid wholly by state funds or the district attorney's assistants, investigators, or other employees;

(4) a county auditor, county purchasing agent, or the auditor's or purchasing agent's assistants or other employees; or

(5) a person employed under Section 76.004, Government Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 89, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 70, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.76, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.018. FORMER PROCEDURES NOT AFFECTED. This subchapter does not affect a lawful procedure or delegation of authority established before January 1, 1972, for setting the salary of a county or precinct employee.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. AMOUNT OF COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES OF COUNTY AUDITOR AND ASSISTANTS

Sec. 152.031. COUNTY AUDITOR'S SALARY. (a) At a hearing held in accordance with Section 152.905, the district judges appointing the county auditor shall set, by a majority vote, the auditor's annual salary as compensation for services and the auditor's travel expenses and other allowances. The action of the district judges must be taken by order and must be recorded as prescribed by Section 152.905 and in the minutes of the district court.

(b) The district clerk shall certify the order to the commissioners court of the county for its observance. The commissioners court shall cause the order to be recorded in its minutes.

(c) The salary shall be paid to the county auditor by monthly payments or by any other distribution at the option of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 11(c), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1169, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 874, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1991.

Sec. 152.032. LIMITATIONS ON COUNTY AUDITOR'S COMPENSATION AND ALLOWANCES. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b), (d), and (e), the amount of the compensation and allowances of a county auditor may not exceed the amount of the compensation and allowances received from all sources by the highest paid elected county officer, other than a judge of a statutory county court, whose salary and allowances are set by the commissioners court.

(b) This subsection applies only to a county that employs an arena venue project manager hired as of March 7, 2001, and that has a population of less than 2.1 million in which a municipality with a population of more than one million is located. The amount of the compensation and allowances of a county auditor in a county subject to this subsection may not exceed the amount of the compensation and allowances received from all sources by the county budget officer. If the county hires a county budget officer at a salary lower than the salary of the previous county budget officer, the county auditor's salary may not be reduced on that basis.

(c) A county auditor who was in office on August 31, 1987, is entitled to be paid an annual salary not less than the annual salary the auditor was being paid on that date.

(d) The amount of the compensation and allowances of a county auditor in a county subject to this subsection may be set in an amount that exceeds the limit established by Subsection (a) if the compensation and allowances are approved by the commissioners court of the county. This subsection applies only to:

(1) a county with a population of 120,000 or more, excluding a county subject to Subsection (b);

(2) a county with a population of more than 1,000 and less than 23,000 that borders the Gulf of Mexico;

(3) a county with a population of more than 11,000 and less than 11,350; and

(4) a county that:

(A) borders a county with a population of more than one million; and

(B) has a population of more than 44,500 and less than 46,500.

(e) This subsection applies only to a county with a population of more than 1.2 million that uses an automated system to enhance internal controls of county finances through the use of automated edit checks of its automated purchasing system and its comprehensive automated payroll system. The amount of the compensation and allowances of a county auditor in a county governed by this subsection may exceed the limit imposed by Subsection (a) if the compensation and allowances are approved by the commissioners court. If a county is governed by this subsection and Subsection (b), the amount of compensation and allowances received by the county auditor may not exceed the limit imposed by Subsection (b).

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 11(c), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 665, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 581, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 2, eff. July 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(64), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.002(11), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 401 (S.B. 833), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 430 (S.B. 1630), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1260 (H.B. 2917), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 15.004, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (H.B. 1230), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 71, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (S.B. 871), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 649 (S.B. 1780), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 134, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.034. SALARIES OF ASSISTANTS TO COUNTY AUDITOR. The salaries of assistants to the county auditor are set in the manner prescribed by Section 84.021.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.035. REIMBURSEMENT FOR MILEAGE EXPENSES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may reimburse the county auditor for expenses incurred in traveling to and from the county seat in the auditor's personal automobile to perform official duties and to attend conferences and seminars relating to the performance of official duties. However, the commissioners court may not reimburse the auditor for expenses incurred in traveling between the auditor's personal residence and county office or for expenses incurred in any other travel of a personal nature.

(b) The commissioners court of a county with a population of 3.3 million or more may reimburse an assistant of a county auditor for the assistant's expenses that are the same kind as those for which the county auditor may be reimbursed under Subsection (a).

(c) The commissioners court by order shall set the reimbursement at a reasonable rate.

(d) Reimbursement shall be paid monthly on submission of a sworn expense report by the person seeking the reimbursement.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER D. WITHHOLDING COMPENSATION OF OFFICER WHO ELECTS NOT TO BE PAID

Sec. 152.051. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "county payroll officer" means the county auditor or other appropriate county officer who issues paychecks to county or precinct personnel.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1259, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1989.

Sec. 152.052. DECISION TO REDUCE COMPENSATION OR NOT TO BE PAID. (a) Within five days after the date an elected county or precinct officer takes office, the officer shall file an affidavit with the county payroll officer stating that the officer elects not to be paid for the officer's services if, during the person's campaign for election to the county or precinct office, the person publicly advocated the abolition of the office. The affidavit must include a statement by the officer describing the method by which the officer intends to seek to obtain the abolition of the office for which the officer was elected and the date by which it is proposed to be accomplished.

(b) An elected county or precinct officer may, at any time, reduce the amount of compensation set for that office by filing with the county payroll officer an affidavit stating that the officer elects to reduce the amount of compensation paid for the officer's service to a specified amount. The reduction is effective on the date the affidavit is filed, and the county payroll officer shall issue any subsequent paychecks for the officer accordingly.

(c) If an officer covered by Subsection (a) or any other elected county or precinct officer files an affidavit with the county payroll officer stating that the officer elects not to be paid for the officer's services, the county payroll officer may not issue a paycheck to the officer.

(d) After an affidavit under Subsection (a) of this section is filed, the county payroll officer shall take measures to stop payment of a paycheck that was issued to the officer before the affidavit was filed and that has not been presented for payment.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1259, Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 1989.

Sec. 152.053. RECORD OF NONPAYMENT. The county payroll officer shall make an entry in the payroll records of the county to show each pay period for which the officer is not paid.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.054. RECOVERY OF PAYROLL TAXES. The county payroll officer shall seek to recover for the county any payroll taxes paid on the officer's compensation that is not paid.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER E. SPECIAL PROVISIONS APPLYING TO SHERIFFS DEPARTMENT

Sec. 152.071. CLASSIFICATION OF POSITIONS; SALARY SCHEDULE. (a) In a county with a population of more than 75,000, the county government shall classify all positions in its sheriff's department and shall specify the duties and prescribe the salary for each classification.

(a-1) A county government in a county that has a population of more than 7,500, is located on an international boundary, and contains no incorporated territory of a municipality may classify all positions in its sheriff's department and may specify the duties and prescribe the salary for each classification.

(b) A member of the sheriff's department who is required to perform the duties of a particular classification is entitled to be paid the salary prescribed for that position during the time the member performs those duties.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 3, eff. July 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.072. PETITION TO INCREASE SALARIES. (a) The qualified voters of a county with a population of more than 25,000 may petition the commissioners court of the county to increase the minimum salary of each member of the sheriff's department.

(a-1) The qualified voters of a county that has a population of more than 7,500, is located on an international boundary, and contains no incorporated territory of a municipality may petition the commissioners court of the county to increase the minimum salary of each member of the sheriff's department.

(b) A petition under this section must:

(1) state the amount of the proposed minimum salary for each rank, pay grade, or classification;

(2) state the effective date of the proposed salary increase;

(3) designate five qualified voters to act as a committee of petitioners authorized to negotiate with the commissioners court under Subsection (g); and

(4) be signed by a number of qualified voters equal to at least 25 percent of the number of voters who voted in the most recent countywide election for county officers.

(c) When a petition is filed under this section, the commissioners court shall:

(1) adopt the proposed minimum salary stated in the petition;

(2) offer an alternative minimum salary proposal under Subsection (g); or

(3) call an election on the proposed minimum salary as provided by this section.

(d) If the commissioners court chooses to call an election, the only issue that may be submitted regarding the salaries of members of the sheriff's department is whether the proposed minimum salary should be adopted. The election shall be held on the first authorized uniform election date under Chapter 41, Election Code:

(1) that occurs after the 65th day after the date the petition was filed; and

(2) on which an election is scheduled to be held throughout the county for other purposes.

(e) The ballot for the election shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Adoption of the proposed minimum salaries of _____________ for members of the Sheriff's Department at an annual cost of ______________, which may or may not cause an increase in the county ad valorem property tax." The proposed salary for each rank, pay grade, or classification as stated in the petition and the total annual cost of the increases must be inserted in the blank spaces.

(f) If a majority of the votes cast at the election favor the adoption of the proposed minimum salary, the minimum salary shall take effect on or before the date specified in the petition as the effective date. If the date on which the results of the official canvass of the election returns are announced is after the date specified in the petition as the effective date, the minimum salary shall take effect beginning with the first full pay period that begins after the date on which the election results are canvassed.

(g) If the commissioners court chooses to offer an alternative minimum salary proposal, the commissioners court shall confer with the committee of petitioners designated in the petition and offer the alternative salary proposal. If the committee accepts the alternative salary proposal, the commissioners court is not required to call an election.

(h) When an election has been held or an alternative salary proposal has been accepted under this section, a petition for another election under this section may not be filed until one year has elapsed after the date the election was held or the alternative salary proposal was accepted.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 272, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 4, eff. July 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.073. PENALTY. (a) A person who is a county official and who is in charge of the sheriff's department or is responsible for setting the compensation provided by Sections 152.071 and 152.072 commits an offense if the person violates Section 152.071 or 152.072.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $10 or more than $100.

(c) Each day on which the county official causes or permits a violation of this section to occur is a separate offense.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 152.074. LONGEVITY PAY FOR COMMISSIONED DEPUTIES AND COUNTY JAILERS. (a) In a county with a population of 150,000 or more, the commissioners court of a county shall provide to each commissioned deputy of the sheriff's department longevity pay in an amount not less than $5 a month for each year of service in the department, up to and including 25 years. Each commissioned deputy is entitled to the longevity pay in addition to the deputy's regular compensation.

(a-1) In a county with a population of 150,000 or more, the commissioners court may provide to each county jailer of the sheriff's department longevity pay in the amount provided to a commissioned deputy under Subsection (a).

(a-2) A county government in a county that has a population of more than 7,500, is located on an international boundary, and contains no incorporated territory of a municipality may provide longevity pay for each commissioned deputy of the sheriff's department of not less than $5 a month for each year of service in the department, up to and including 25 years. If longevity pay is provided for, each commissioned deputy is entitled to the longevity pay in addition to the deputy's regular compensation.

(b) The commissioners court shall begin providing the longevity pay at the beginning of the first fiscal year after the date this section becomes applicable to the county.

(c) In this section, "county jailer" has the meaning assigned by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 505, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 5, eff. July. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(65), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.075. COMPENSATION FOR RESERVE DEPUTY SHERIFFS. (a) The commissioners court of a county may compensate a reserve deputy sheriff as provided by law for the compensation of a deputy sheriff.

(b) The commissioners court may reimburse a reserve deputy sheriff for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 152.901. TRAVEL EXPENSES FOR CERTAIN COUNTY AGENTS AND BOARD MEMBERS. (a) The commissioners court of a county may authorize the payment of reasonable travel expenses incurred by a person who:

(1) is an agent of the county, or is a board or committee member appointed by the commissioners court; and

(2) is not a county or precinct officer or employee whose travel expenses may be set under Section 152.011.

(b) The travel expenses must be incurred by the person while performing county business authorized by the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.902. COMPENSATION FOR RESERVE DEPUTY CONSTABLES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may compensate a reserve deputy constable as provided by law for the compensation of a deputy constable.

(b) The commissioners court may reimburse a reserve deputy constable for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 152.903. COMPENSATION FOR INTERPRETERS EMPLOYED BY DISTRICT COURTS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the commissioners court of a county may set the compensation of interpreters employed by the district courts in the county.

(b) The salary of an interpreter shall be paid on warrants issued by the district court or the clerk of the court in favor of the interpreter.

(c) The salary of an interpreter appointed under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is payable in equal monthly payments or by any other distribution at the option of the county.

(d) This section does not apply to interpreters for deaf or deaf-mute persons appointed under Subchapter A, Chapter 21, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, or Article 38.31, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 874, Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 1991.

Sec. 152.904. COMPENSATION OF COUNTY JUDGE IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) The county judge of Gregg County is entitled to receive an annual salary set by the commissioners court at an amount that does not exceed 90 percent of the total annual salary paid to any district judge in the county.

(b) The county judge of El Paso County is entitled to receive an annual salary in an amount not to exceed 90 percent of the total annual salary, including supplements, paid to any district judge in the county.

(c) The commissioners court of a county with a population of 315,000 to 351,000 shall set the annual salary of the county judge at an amount equal to or greater than 90 percent of the salary, including supplements, of any district judge in Galveston County. However, the salary may not be set at an amount less than the salary paid the county judge on May 2, 1962.

(d) The county judge of Webb County is entitled to receive a salary set by the commissioners court at at least $20,000, but not more than the salary, including any supplements, paid to a district judge in the county. The salary shall be paid out of the county treasury by order of the commissioners court and shall be paid monthly in equal installments or by any other distribution at the option of the county.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Harris County shall set the annual salary of the county judge at an amount that is not less than $1,000 more than the total annual salary received by county criminal court at law judges in the county. The salary shall be paid in equal biweekly installments.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.11(d), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 90, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 874, Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 72, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 560), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 135, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.905. PROCEDURES FOR SETTING COMPENSATION BY DISTRICT JUDGES. (a) This section applies only to the compensation of the county auditor, assistant auditors, and court reporters.

(b) Before setting the amount of annual compensation of the county auditor, assistant auditors, and court reporters, the district judge or judges shall hold a public hearing on the matter at which parties in interest and citizens have an opportunity to be heard.

(c) Not earlier than the 30th or later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing, notice of the time, place, and subject of the hearing must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(d) At the hearing, the district judge or judges shall set the amount of compensation of the county auditor, assistant auditors, and court reporters considered at the hearing. The vote must be recorded, transcribed, and maintained as a public record.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1169, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 1, eff. July 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.906. LONGEVITY PAY FOR DEPUTY CONSTABLES. In a county with a population of 190,000 or more, the commissioners court may provide for each county employee or classification of county employee, including, but not limited to, deputy constables, longevity pay, in addition to regular compensation, of $5 a month, or any other amount determined by the commissioners court, for each year of service in the county, up to and including 30 years.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 773, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.907. CONTINUING EDUCATION EXPENSES FOR COUNTY AND PRECINCT OFFICERS. The commissioners court of a county may authorize payment of reasonable continuing education expenses incurred by a county or precinct officer if the expenses are related to the officer's official duties, including expenses incurred by the officer between the general election at which the officer is elected and the beginning of the officer's term of office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.